Tennessee, session 114, SB1609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1509(f), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(f)
(1) The department shall prepare annually for submission by the
governor to the secretary of the United States department of health and human
services the report required by Section 1926 of subpart I of Part B of Title XIX of
the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. § 300x-26).
(2) The department shall prepare for submission to the general assembly
and the public an annual report describing in detail the department's enforcement
efforts under this part, with the report to be submitted no later than December 31
of each year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1609
011039
- 1 -